Louisiana, session 2026, HB957.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:706(A)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§706. Transfer of prisoners to jail of another parish
A.
* * *
(2) If the prisoner or prisoners to be transferred are not under sentence to the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, the sheriff proposing to make the
transfer shall notify the prosecuting authority and the court which that set bail for the
prisoner or prisoners at least seventy-two hours before making the transfer.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.